Florida, session 2026, HB1511.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. In the interest of promoting judicial
efficiency and to provide consistency in decisions impacting
businesses, the Legislature recommends that the Supreme Court
create a statewide business court to resolve business disputes.
Section 2. Subsection (1) of section 607.0122, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
607.0122 Fees for filing documents and issuing
certificates.—The department shall collect the following fees
when the documents described in this section are delivered to
the department for filing:
(1) Articles of incorporation: $0.99 $35.
Section 3. Section 220.223, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
220.223 New Corporation Tax Refund.—Notwithstanding any
other law, any tax paid by a company in its first taxable year
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1511-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1511 2026
shall be refunded to the company in its third taxable year.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1511-00